North Carolina, session 2025, SB246.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) There is appropriated from the General Fund to the Department of
Health and Human Services, Division of Health Benefits (DHB), the sum of one hundred
thirty-four million dollars ($134,000,000) in recurring funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and
the sum of three hundred fifty-seven million three hundred forty thousand dollars ($357,340,000)
in recurring funds for the 2026-2027 fiscal year to be used to increase the number of North
Carolina Innovations Waiver slots, as directed by this act. These funds shall provide a State match
for two hundred forty-four million seven hundred fifty thousand dollars ($244,750,000) in
*S246-v-1*

General Assembly Of North Carolina Session 2025
recurring federal funds for the 2025-2026 fiscal year and the sum of six hundred fifty-two million
six hundred sixty thousand dollars ($652,660,000) in recurring federal funds for the 2026-2027
fiscal year, and those federal funds are appropriated to the Division of Health Benefits for
implementation of this act.
SECTION 1.(b) DHB shall amend the North Carolina Innovations Waiver to
increase the number of waiver slots available under the waiver for the 2025-2026 fiscal year by
5,000. These 5,000 waiver slots shall be distributed in accordance with subsection (c) of this
section and are to be made available October 1, 2025, unless the method of acceptance or
rejection of waiver slots detailed in subsection (c) of this section requires approval by the Centers
for Medicare and Medicaid Services (CMS). If CMS approval is required, then any waiver slots
that are rejected under the procedure described in subsection (c) of this section shall be made
available October 1, 2025, or the date that CMS grants or denies approval of the rejection and
acceptance procedure, whichever is later. If CMS approval is required and CMS does not approve
the rejection and acceptance procedure in subsection (c) of this section, then any rejected waiver
slots shall remain distributed using the allocation formula currently in place as of the effective
date of this act.
SECTION 1.(c) DHB shall distribute the initial 5,000 waiver slots identified under
subsection (b) of this section using the allocation formula currently in place as of the effective
date of this act, provided that all waiver slots shall be filled on a first-come, first-served basis
determined by the length of time an individual has been on the waiting list for an Innovations
Waiver slot. Each LME/MCO shall, within 30 days of receiving the offer of the waiver slot, elect
whether to accept some, all, or none of the waiver slots offered. All waiver slots not accepted by
an LME/MCO shall be distributed equally among the LME/MCOs that attest to the following
requirements:
(1) The LME/MCO ensures that all rates paid to providers for any services
provided to beneficiaries receiving those services through the Innovations
Waiver are sufficient to pay its direct care employees a minimum wage of
twenty dollars ($20.00) per hour. The LME/MCO may include in the rates
paid any additional amounts authorized by the General Assembly that are
designated for direct care personnel wages.
(2) The ability and capacity to provide services to the beneficiaries that will
receive the additional waiver slots exists within the LME/MCO's catchment
area.
Any election by an LME/MCO to accept or reject additional waiver slots made
available under this section shall not impact the distribution of any waiver slots available in the
2026-2027 fiscal year.
SECTION 1.(d) DHB shall amend the North Carolina Innovations Waiver to
increase the number of waiver slots available under the waiver for the 2026-2027 fiscal year by
5,000. These 5,000 waiver slots shall be distributed using the allocation formula currently in
place as of the effective date of this act; provided all waiver slots shall be filled on a first-come,
first-served basis determined by the length of time an individual has been on the waiting list for
an Innovations Waiver slot. These waiver slots shall be made available July 1, 2026.
SECTION 2. This act becomes effective July 1, 2025.
Page 2 Senate Bill 246-First Edition